Utah statutes.
63G-6-813 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Factual determination of procurement appeals panel final and conclusive.

A determination of an issue of fact by a procurement appeals panel may not be overturned on appeal, unless the determination is arbitrary and capricious or clearly erroneous.

